Washington statutes.
RCW 18.100.132

Nonprofit professional service corporations formed under prior law.

A nonprofit professional service corporation formed pursuant to *chapter 431, Laws of 1985, may amend its articles of incorporation at any time before July 31, 1987, to comply with the provisions of this chapter. Compliance under this chapter shall relate back and take effect as of the date of formation of the corporation under *chapter 431, Laws of 1985, and the corporate existence shall be deemed to have continued without interruption from that date.

[ 1986 c 261 s 4.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: Chapter 431, Laws of 1985 enacted RCW 24.03.038, which was repealed by 1986 c 261 s 7.